Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1428
Economic expansion and diversification; postsecondary education priorities; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Expansion and diversification of Nebraska's economy is necessary in order to sustain essential public services sponsored or aided by the state;

(2) Increasing the number of Nebraskans with high levels of educational attainment is essential to support economic expansion and diversification;

(3) In order to increase the number of Nebraskans with high levels of educational attainment, the state's postsecondary education system shall include, but not be limited to, the following key priorities that were identified by the LR 174 Task Force of 2003:

(a) Increasing the number of students who enter postsecondary education in Nebraska;

(b) Increasing the percentage of students who enroll and successfully complete a degree; and

(c) Reducing, eliminating, and then reversing the net out-migration of Nebraskans with high levels of educational attainment; and

(4) Unprecedented collaboration and cooperation between and among educational institutions and sectors will be necessary to develop community, regional, and statewide strategies to achieve progress toward these priorities and to assist the state in serving Nebraska students and allowing them to reach their academic caliber.

Laws 2006, LB 962, § 7.